Utah statutes.
72-9-604.   Regulatory powers of local authorities -- Tow trucks.

(1)  A county or municipal legislative or governing body may not enact or enforce any ordinance, regulation, rule, or fee pertaining to a tow truck or tow truck motor carrier that conflicts with this part.

(2)  A tow truck motor carrier that has a county or municipal business license for a place of business located within that county or municipality may not be required to obtain another business license in order to perform a tow truck service in another county or municipality if there is not a business location in the other county or municipality.

(3)  A county or municipal legislative body may require an annual tow truck safety inspection in addition to the inspections required under Sections 53-8-205 and 72-9-602 if:

(a)  no fee is charged for the inspection; and

(b)  the inspection complies with federal motor carrier safety regulations.

(4)  A tow truck shall be subject to only one annual safety inspection under Subsection (3).  A county or municipality that requires the additional annual safety inspection shall accept the same inspection performed by another county or municipality.

